Hawaii statutes.
[§502-122] Electronic document and
electronic signature; validity. (a) The registrar may accept an
electronic document for recording. The electronic document shall be exempt
from any requirement under this chapter that a document or instrument be:

(1) The original document or instrument;

(2) On paper, cloth, or other tangible medium; or

(3) In writing.

(b) When a law requires as a condition for
recording, that a document be signed, the requirement is satisfied by an
electronic signature.

(c) Any requirement that a document or a
signature associated with a document be notarized, acknowledged, verified,
witnessed, or made under oath shall be satisfied if the electronic signature of
the person authorized to perform that act, and all other information required
to be included, is attached to or logically associated with the document or
signature. It shall not be necessary to accompany an electronic signature with
a physical or electronic image or a stamp, impression, or seal.

(d) In a proceeding, evidence of a document or
signature shall not be excluded solely because it is in electronic form. [L
2009, c 102, pt of §2(1)]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next